Utah, session 2026, HB220.
Section 1. Section 53-5a-602 is amended to read:53-5a-602. Criminal background check before purchase of a firearm -- Fee -- Exemption for concealed firearm permit holders and law enforcement officers.(1)(a)To establish personal identification and residence in this state for purposes of this part, a dealer shall require an individual receiving a firearm to present one photo identification on a form issued by a governmental agency of the state.(b)A dealer may not accept a driving privilege card issued under Section 53-3-207 as proof of identification for the purpose of establishing personal identification and residence in this state as required under this Subsection (1).(2)(a)A criminal history background check is required for the sale of a firearm by a licensed firearm dealer in the state.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not apply to the sale of a firearm to a Federal Firearms Licensee.(3)(a)An individual purchasing a firearm from a dealer shall consent in writing to a criminal background check, on a form provided by the bureau.(b)The form shall contain the following information:(i)the dealer identification number;(ii)the name and address of the individual receiving the firearm;(iii)the date of birth, height, weight, eye color, and hair color of the individual receiving the firearm; and(iv)the social security number or any other identification number of the individual receiving the firearm.(4)(a)The dealer shall send the information required by Subsection (3) to the bureau immediately upon its receipt by the dealer.(b)A dealer may not sell or transfer a firearm to an individual until the dealer has provided the bureau with the information in Subsection (3) and has received approval from the bureau under Subsection (6).(5)The dealer shall make a request for criminal history background information by telephone or other electronic means to the bureau and shall receive approval or denial of the inquiry by telephone or other electronic means.(6)When the dealer calls for or requests a criminal history background check, the bureau shall:(a)review the criminal history files, including juvenile court records, and the temporary restricted file created under Section 53-5a-504, to determine if the individual is prohibited from purchasing, possessing, or transferring a firearm by state or federal law;(b)inform the dealer that:(i)the records indicate the individual is prohibited; or(ii)the individual is approved for purchasing, possessing, or transferring a firearm;(c)provide the dealer with a unique transaction number for that inquiry; and(d)provide a response to the requesting dealer during the call for a criminal background check, or by return call, or other electronic means, without delay, except in case of electronic failure or other circumstances beyond the control of the bureau, the bureau shall advise the dealer of the reason for the delay and give the dealer an estimate of the length of the delay.(7)(a)The bureau may not maintain any records of the criminal history background check longer than 20 days from the date of the dealer's request, if the bureau determines that the individual receiving the firearm is not prohibited from purchasing, possessing, or transferring the firearm under state or federal law.(b)However, the bureau shall maintain a log of requests containing the dealer's federal firearms number, the transaction number, and the transaction date for a period of 12 months.(8)(a)If the criminal history background check discloses information indicating that the individual attempting to purchase the firearm is prohibited from purchasing, possessing, or transferring a firearm, the bureau shall:(i)within 24 hours after determining that the purchaser is prohibited from purchasing, possessing, or transferring a firearm, notify the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the dealer is located; and(ii)inform the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the individual resides.(b)Subsection (8)(a) does not apply to an individual prohibited from purchasing a firearm solely due to placement on the temporary restricted list under Section 53-5a-504.(c)A law enforcement agency that receives information from the bureau under Subsection (8)(a) shall provide a report before August 1 of each year to the bureau that includes:(i)based on the information the bureau provides to the law enforcement agency under Subsection (8)(a), the number of cases that involve an individual who is prohibited from purchasing, possessing, or transferring a firearm as a result of a conviction for an offense involving domestic violence; and(ii)of the cases described in Subsection (8)(c)(i):(A)the number of cases the law enforcement agency investigates; and(B)the number of cases the law enforcement agency investigates that result in a criminal charge.(d)The bureau shall:(i)compile the information from the reports described in Subsection (8)(c);(ii)omit or redact any identifying information in the compilation; and(iii)submit the compilation to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim CommitteeState Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201 before November 1 of each year.(9)If an individual is denied the right to purchase a firearm under this section, the individual may review the individual's criminal history information and may challenge or amend the information as provided in Section 53-10-108.(10)The bureau shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to ensure the identity, confidentiality, and security of all records provided by the bureau under this part are in conformance with the requirements of the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act, Pub. L. No. 103-159, 107 Stat. 1536 (1993).(11)(a)A dealer shall collect a criminal history background check fee for the sale of a firearm under this section.(b)The fee described under Subsection (11)(a) remains in effect until changed by the bureau through the process described in Section 63J-1-504.(c)(i)The dealer shall forward at one time all fees collected for criminal history background checks performed during the month to the bureau by the last day of the month following the sale of a firearm.(ii)The bureau shall deposit the fees in the General Fund as dedicated credits to cover the cost of administering and conducting the criminal history background check program.(12)(a)An individual with a concealed firearm permit issued under Section 53-5a-303 or a provisional concealed firearm permit issued under Section 53-5a-304 is exempt from the background check and corresponding fee required in this section for the purchase of a firearm if:(i)the individual presents the individual's concealed firearm permit to the dealer prior to before purchase of the firearm; and(ii)the dealer verifies with the bureau that the individual's concealed firearm permit is valid.(b)An individual with a temporary permit to carry a concealed firearm issued under Section 53-5a-305 is not exempt from a background check and the corresponding fee required in this section for the purchase of a firearm.(13)(a)A law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 53-13-103, is exempt from the background check fee required in this section for the purchase of a personal firearm to be carried while off-duty if the law enforcement officer verifies current employment by providing a letter of good standing from the officer's commanding officer and current law enforcement photo identification.(b)Subsection (13)(a) may only be used by a law enforcement officer to purchase a personal firearm once in a 24-month period.(14)A dealer engaged in the business of selling, leasing, or otherwise transferring a firearm shall:(a)make the firearm safety brochure described in Subsection 26B-5-211(3) available to a customer free of charge; and(b)at the time of purchase, distribute a cable-style gun lock provided to the dealer under Subsection 26B-5-211(3) to a customer purchasing a shotgun, short barreled shotgun, short barreled rifle, rifle, or another firearm that federal law does not require be accompanied by a gun lock at the time of purchase.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-10-910 is amended to read:53-10-910. Reporting requirement.The Department of Public Safety and the Utah Bureau of Forensic Services shall report by July 31 of each year to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201, the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee, and the Criminal Justice Appropriations Subcommittee regarding:(1)the timelines set for testing all sexual assault kits submitted to the Utah Bureau of Forensic Services as provided in Subsection 53-10-903(2);(2)the goals established in Section 53-10-909;(3)the status of meeting those goals;(4)the number of sexual assault kits that are sent to the Utah Bureau of Forensic Services for testing;(5)the number of restricted kits held by law enforcement;(6)the number of sexual assault kits that are not processed in accordance with the timelines established in this part; and(7)future appropriations requests that will ensure that all DNA cases can be processed according to the timelines established by this part.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53H-7-603 is amended to read:53H-7-603. Student housing crime reporting.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Campus law enforcement" means an institution's police department.(b)"Crime statistics" means the number of each of the crimes in 34 C.F.R. Sec. 668.46(c)(1) that are reported to a local police agency or campus law enforcement, listed by type of crime.(c)(i)"Institution noncampus housing facility" means a building or property that:(A)is used for housing students;(B)is not part of the institution's campus; and(C)the institution owns, manages, controls, or leases;(ii)"Institution noncampus housing facility" includes real property that is adjacent to, and is used in direct support of, the building or property described in Subsection (1)(c)(i).(d)"Local law enforcement agency" means a state or local law enforcement agency other than campus law enforcement.(e)(i)"On-campus housing facility" means a building or property that is:(A)used for housing students; and(B)part of the institution's campus.(ii)"On-campus housing facility" includes real property that is:(A)adjacent to the on-campus housing facility; and(B)used in direct support of the on-campus housing facility.(f)"Student housing" means:(i)an institution noncampus housing facility;(ii)an on-campus housing facility; or(iii)a student organization noncampus housing facility.(g)"Student organization" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53H-7-101.(h)"Student organization noncampus housing facility" means a building or property that:(i)is used for housing students;(ii)is not part of the institution's campus; and(iii)(A)a student organization owns, manages, controls, or leases; or(B)is real property that is adjacent to the student organization noncampus housing facility and is used in direct support of the noncampus housing facility.(2)An institution with the types of housing facilities described in this Subsection (2) shall:(a)create a report of crime statistics aggregated by:(i)on-campus housing facility, identified and listed individually using the institution's system for inventorying institution facilities;(ii)institution noncampus housing facility, identified and listed individually using the institution's system for inventorying institution facilities; and(iii)student organization noncampus housing facilities, identified and listed individually using the institution's system for identifying student organization noncampus housing facilities; and(b)report annually to the Education Interim Committee and the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee, at or before the committee's  November meetings, on crime statistics aggregated by housing facility as described in Subsection(2)(a).; and(c)on or before November 1 of each year, provide the crime statistics aggregated by housing facility as described in Subsection (2)(a) to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201.(3)An institution that does not have the types of housing described in Subsection (2) shall report the crime statistics as required by 20 U.S.C. Section 1092(f), the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act, to the entities specified in Subsection (2).(4)Upon request from an institution, a local law enforcement agency shall provide to the institution crime statistics for each student housing facility over which the local law enforcement agency has jurisdiction.(5)Except as provided in Section 53H-7-503, when campus law enforcement receives a complaint or report of a crime that campus law enforcement reasonably determines occurred outside of campus law enforcement's jurisdiction, campus law enforcement shall share any record of the complaint or report with the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63A-16-1002 is amended to read:16. Governance of Technology63A-16-1002. Public safety portal.(1)The commission shall oversee the creation and management of a public safety portal for information and data required to be reported to the commission and accessible to all criminal justice agencies in the state.(2)The division shall assist with the development and management of the public safety portal.(3)The division, in collaboration with the commission, shall create:(a)master standards and formats for information submitted to the public safety portal;(b)a gateway, bridge, website, or other method for reporting entities to provide the information;(c)a master data management index or system to assist in the retrieval of information from the public safety portal;(d)a protocol for accessing information in the public safety portal that complies with state privacy regulations; and(e)a protocol for real-time audit capability of all data accessed from the public safety portal by participating data source, data use entities, and regulators.;(f)a protocol for de-identifying the data described in Subsection (4) for public use;(g)a searchable portion of the public safety portal described in Subsection (4) available to the public that displays the de-identified data as described in Subsection (3)(f); and(h)subject to the restrictions in this section, a policy concerning the use and dissemination of data obtained under this section.(4)The public safety portal shall be the repository for the statutorily required data, information, or reports described in:(a)Section 13-53-111, Recidivism reporting requirements;(b)Section 17-72-408, County jail reporting requirements;(c)Section 17E-2-201, Criminal Justice Coordinating Councils reporting;(d)Section 26B-1-427, Alcohol Abuse Tracking Committee;(e)Section 41-6a-511, Courts to collect and maintain data;(f)Section 53-5a-602, regarding data of attempted weapons purchases by restricted persons;(f)(g)Section 53-10-118, Regardingregarding driving under the influence data;(h)Section 53-10-910, regarding sexual assault kits;(g)(i)Section 53-25-301, Reporting requirements for reverse-location warrants;(h)(j)Section 53-25-202, Sexual assault offense reporting requirements for law enforcement agencies;(i)Section 53E-3-516, School disciplinary and law enforcement action report;(j)(k)Section 53-25-501, Reporting requirements for seized firearms;(k)(l)Section 53-25-502, Law enforcement agency reporting requirements for certain firearm data;(m)Section 53E-3-516, School disciplinary and law enforcement action report;(n)Section 53H-7-603, Student housing crime reporting;(l)(o)Section 63M-7-214, Law enforcement agency grant reporting;(m)(p)Section 63M-7-216, Prosecutorial data collection;(n)(q)Section 63M-7-216.1, Prosecutorial data collection regarding certain prosecutions, dismissals, and declinations to prosecute;(o)(r)Section 63M-7-220, Domestic violence data collection;(s)Section 63M-7-1106, regarding annual reporting from the Prosecutor Conduct Commission;(t)Section 64-13-47, regarding data of sexual assaults;(p)(u)Section 64-14-204, Supervision of sentenced offenders placed in community;(q)(v)Section 64-13-25, Standards for programs;(r)(w)Section 64-13-45, Department reporting requirements;(s)(x)Section 64-13e-104, County correctional facility reimbursement program for state probationary inmates and state parole inmates;(y)Section 67-5-22.7, regarding data from the multi-agency strike force to combat violent and other major felony crimes;(t)(z)Section 77-7-8.5, Use of tactical groups;(u)(aa)Section 77-11b-404, Forfeiture reporting requirements;(v)(bb)Section 77-20-103, Release data requirements;(w)(cc)Section 77-22-2.5, Court orders for criminal investigations;(dd)Section 77-27-32, regarding metrics from the Board of Pardons and Parole;(x)(ee)Section 78A-2-109.5, Court data collection on criminal cases;(ff)Section 80-5-202, regarding data of sexual assaults;(y)(gg)Section 80-6-104, Data collection on offenses committed by minors; and(z)(hh)any other statutes that require the collection of specific data and the reporting of that data to the commission.(5)Before October 1, 2025, the commission shall report all data collected to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee.(6)(5)The commission may:(a)enter into contracts with private or governmental entities to assist entities in complying with the data reporting requirements of Subsection (4); and(b)make, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, rules to administer this section, including establishing requirements and procedures for collecting the data, information, or reports described in Subsection (4).

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 63G-2-201 is amended to read:63G-2-201. Provisions relating to records -- Public records -- Private, controlled, protected, and other restricted records -- Disclosure and nondisclosure of records -- Certified copy of record -- Limits on obligation to respond to record request.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a person has the right to inspect a public record free of charge, and the right to take a copy of a public record during normal working hours, subject to Sections 63G-2-203 and 63G-2-204.(b)A right under Subsection (1)(a) does not apply with respect to a record:(i)a copy of which the governmental entity has already provided to the person;(ii)that is the subject of a records request that the governmental entity is not required to fill under Subsection (7)(a)(v); or(iii)(A)that is accessible only by a computer or other electronic device owned or controlled by the governmental entity;(B)that is part of an electronic file that also contains a record that is private, controlled, or protected; and(C)that the governmental entity cannot readily segregate from the part of the electronic file that contains a private, controlled, or protected record.(2)A record is public unless otherwise expressly provided by statute.(3)The following records are not public:(a)a record that is private, controlled, or protected under Sections 63G-2-302, 63G-2-303, 63G-2-304, and 63G-2-305; and(b)a record to which access is restricted pursuant toin accordance with court rule, another state statute, federal statute, or federal regulation, including records for which access is governed or restricted as a condition of participation in a state or federal program or for receiving state or federal funds.(4)Only a record specified in Section 63G-2-302, 63G-2-303, 63G-2-304, or 63G-2-305 may be classified private, controlled, or protected.(5)(a)A governmental entity may not disclose a record that is private, controlled, or protected to any person except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), Subsection (5)(c), Section 63G-2-202, 63G-2-206, or 63G-2-303.(b)A governmental entity may disclose a record that is private under Subsection 63G-2-302(2) or protected under Section 63G-2-305 to persons other than those specified in Section 63G-2-202 or 63G-2-206 if the head of a governmental entity, or a designee, determines that:(i)there is no interest in restricting access to the record; or(ii)the interests favoring access are greater than or equal to the interest favoring restriction of access.(c)In addition to the disclosure under Subsection (5)(b), a governmental entity may disclose a record that is protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(51) if:(i)the head of the governmental entity, or a designee, determines that the disclosure:(A)is mutually beneficial to:(I)the subject of the record;(II)the governmental entity; and(III)the public; and(B)serves a public purpose related to:(I)public safety; or(II)consumer protection; and(ii)the person who receives the record from the governmental entity agrees not to use or allow the use of the record for advertising or solicitation purposes.(6)A governmental entity shall provide a person with a certified copy of a record if:(a)the person requesting the record has a right to inspect it;(b)the person identifies the record with reasonable specificity; and(c)the person pays the lawful fees.(7)(a)In response to a request, a governmental entity is not required to:(i)create a record;(ii)compile, format, manipulate, package, summarize, or tailor information;(iii)provide a record in a particular format, medium, or program not currently maintained by the governmental entity;(iv)fulfill a person's records request if the request unreasonably duplicates prior records requests from that person;(v)fill a person's records request if:(A)the record requested is:(I)publicly accessible online; or(II)included in a public publication or product produced by the governmental entity receiving the request; and(B)the governmental entity:(I)specifies to the person requesting the record where the record is accessible online; or(II)provides the person requesting the record with the public publication or product and specifies where the record can be found in the public publication or product; or(vi)fulfill a person's records request if:(A)the person has been determined under Section 63G-2-209 to be a vexatious requester;(B)the order of the director of the Government Records Office determining the person to be a vexatious requester provides that the governmental entity is not required to fulfill a request from the person for a period of time; and(C)the period of time described in Subsection (7)(a)(vi)(B) has not expired.(b)A governmental entity shall conduct a reasonable search for a requested record.(8)(a)Although not required to do so, a governmental entity may, upon request from the person who submitted the records request, compile, format, manipulate, package, summarize, or tailor information or provide a record in a format, medium, or program not currently maintained by the governmental entity.(b)In determining whether to fulfill a request described in Subsection (8)(a), a governmental entity may consider whether the governmental entity is able to fulfill the request without unreasonably interfering with the governmental entity's duties and responsibilities.(c)A governmental entity may require a person who makes a request under Subsection (8)(a) to pay the governmental entity, in accordance with Section 63G-2-203, for providing the information or record as requested.(9)(a)Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and subject to Subsection (9)(b), a governmental entity is not required to respond to, or provide a record in response to, a record request if the request is submitted by or in behalf of an individual who is on parole or confined in a jail or other correctional facility following the individual's conviction.(b)Subsection (9)(a) does not apply to:(i)the first five record requests submitted to the governmental entity by or in behalf of an individual described in Subsection (9)(a) during any calendar year requesting only a record that contains a specific reference to the individual; or(ii)a record request that is submitted by an attorney of an individual described in Subsection (9)(a).(10)(a)A governmental entity may allow a person requesting more than 50 pages of records to copy the records if:(i)the records are contained in files that do not contain records that are exempt from disclosure, or the records may be segregated to remove private, protected, or controlled information from disclosure; and(ii)the governmental entity provides reasonable safeguards to protect the public from the potential for loss of a public record.(b)If the requirements of Subsection (10)(a) are met, the governmental entity may:(i)provide the requester with the facilities for copying the requested records and require that the requester make the copies; or(ii)allow the requester to provide the requester's own copying facilities and personnel to make the copies at the governmental entity's offices and waive the fees for copying the records.(11)(a)A governmental entity that owns an intellectual property right and that offers the intellectual property right for sale or license may control by ordinance or policy the duplication and distribution of the material based on terms the governmental entity considers to be in the public interest.(b)Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or impair the rights or protections granted to the governmental entity under federal copyright or patent law as a result of its ownership of the intellectual property right.(12)A governmental entity may not use the physical form, electronic or otherwise, in which a record is stored to deny, or unreasonably hinder the rights of a person to inspect and receive a copy of a record under this chapter.(13)Subject to the requirements of Subsection (7), a governmental entity shall provide access to an electronic copy of a record in lieu of providing access to its paper equivalent if:(a)the person making the request requests or states a preference for an electronic copy;(b)the governmental entity currently maintains the record in an electronic format that is reproducible and may be provided without reformatting or conversion; and(c)the electronic copy of the record:(i)does not disclose other records that are exempt from disclosure; or(ii)may be segregated to protect private, protected, or controlled information from disclosure without the undue expenditure of public resources or funds.(14)In determining whether a record is properly classified as private under Subsection 63G-2-302(2)(d), the governmental entity, the director of the Government Records Office, local appeals board, or court shall consider and weigh:(a)any personal privacy interests, including those in images, that would be affected by disclosure of the records in question; and(b)any public interests served by disclosure.(15)Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201:(a)is not required to provide a record in response to a record request that requests records received by the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice under Section 63A-16-1002; and(b)shall inform the person making a record request for a record described in Subsection (15)(a) of the governmental entity from which the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice received the record.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 63M-7-1106 is amended to read:63M-7-1106. Annual reporting requirement to Legislature.(1)Before November 1 of each year, the commission shall report to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201, the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee, and the Judiciary Interim Committee on:(a)the number of complaints received;(b)the general nature of the complaints;(c)the number of complaints dismissed without an investigation;(d)the number of complaints investigated;(e)the general findings and outcomes of investigations; and(f)the name of any prosecuting agency that refused, without reasonable cause, to cooperate in an investigation by the commission.(2)The commission may not include any personal identifying information regarding a prosecuting attorney in a report described in Subsection (1).

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 64-13-47 is amended to read:64-13-47. Prison Sexual Assault Prevention Program.(1)The department shall, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules establishing policies and procedures regarding sexual assaults that occur in correctional facilities.(2)The rules described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)require education and training, including:(i)providing to inmates, at intake and periodically, department-approved, easy-to-understand information developed by the department on sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling in consultation with community groups with expertise in sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling; and(ii)providing sexual-assault-specific training to department mental health professionals and all employees who have direct contact with inmates regarding treatment and methods of prevention and investigation;(b)require reporting of sexual assault, including:(i)ensuring the confidentiality of inmate sexual assault complaints and the protection of inmates who make complaints of sexual assault; and(ii)prohibiting retaliation and disincentives for reporting sexual assault;(c)require safety and care for victims, including:(i)providing, in situations in which there is reason to believe that a sexual assault has occurred, reasonable and appropriate measures to ensure the victim's safety by separating the victim from the assailant, if known;(ii)providing acute trauma care for sexual assault victims, including treatment of injuries, HIV prophylaxis measures, and testing for sexually transmitted infections;(iii)providing confidential mental health counseling for victims of sexual assault, including access to outside community groups or victim advocates that have expertise in sexual assault counseling, and enable confidential communication between inmates and those organizations and advocates; and(iv)monitoring victims of sexual assault for suicidal impulses, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and other mental health consequences resulting from the sexual assault;(d)require investigations and staff discipline, including:(i)requiring all employees to report any knowledge, suspicion, or information regarding an incident of sexual assault to the executive director or designee, and require disciplinary action for employees who fail to report as required;(ii)requiring investigations described in Subsection (3);(iii)requiring corrections investigators to submit all completed sexual assault allegations to the executive director or the executive director's designee, who mustshall then submit any substantiated findings that may constitute a crime under state law to the district attorney with jurisdiction over the facility in which the alleged sexual assault occurred; and(iv)requiring employees to be subject to disciplinary sanctions up to and including termination for violating agency sexual assault policies, with termination the presumptive disciplinary sanction for employees who have engaged in sexual assault, consistent with constitutional due process protections and state personnel laws and rules; and(e)require data collection and reporting, including as provided in Subsection (4).(3)(a)An investigator trained in the investigation of sex crimes shall conduct the investigation of a sexual assault involving an inmate.(b)The investigation shall include:(i)using a forensic rape kit, if appropriate;(ii)questioning suspects and witnesses; and(iii)gathering and preserving relevant evidence.(4)The department shall:(a)collect and report data regarding all allegations of sexual assault from each correctional facility in accordance with the federal Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003, Pub. L 108-79, as amended; and(b)annually report the data described in Subsection (4)(a) to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committeethe State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 67-5-22.7 is amended to read:67-5-22.7. Multi-agency strike force to combat violent and other major felony crimes associated with illegal immigration and human trafficking -- Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit.(1)The Office of the Attorney General is authorized to administer and coordinate the operation of a multi-agency strike force to combat violent and other major felony crimes committed within the state that are associated with illegal immigration and human trafficking.(2)The office shall invite officers of the U.S.United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement and state and local law enforcement personnel to participate in this mutually supportive, multi-agency strike force to more effectively utilize their combined skills, expertise, and resources.(3)The strike force shall focus its efforts on detecting, investigating, deterring, and eradicating violent and other major felony criminal activity related to illegal immigration and human trafficking.(4)In conjunction with the strike force and subject to available funding, the Office of the Attorney General shall establish a Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit:(a)for the primary purpose of investigating, apprehending, and prosecuting individuals or entities that participate in the sale or distribution of fraudulent documents used for identification purposes;(b)to specialize in fraudulent identification documents created and prepared for individuals who are unlawfully residing within the state; and(c)to administer the Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account created under Subsection (5).(5)(a)There is created a restricted account in the General Fund known as the "Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account."(b)The Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account shall consist of money appropriated to the Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account by the Legislature.(c)Subject to appropriations from the Legislature, beginning on the program start date, as defined in Section 63G-12-102, the Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit may expend the money in the Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account to pay a claim as provided in this Subsection (5) to a person who is a victim of identity theft prosecuted under Section 76-11-215 or 76-6-1102.(d)To obtain payment from the Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account, a person shall file a claim with the Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit by no later than one year after the day on which an individual is convicted, pleads guilty to, pleads no contest to, pleads guilty in a similar manner to, or resolved by diversion or its equivalent an offense under Section 76-11-215 or 76-6-1102 for the theft of the identity of the person filing the claim.(e)A claim filed under this Subsection (5) shall include evidence satisfactory to the Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit:(i)that the person is the victim of identity theft described in Subsection (5)(d); and(ii)of the actual damages experienced by the person as a result of the identity theft that are not recovered from a public or private source.(f)The Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit shall pay a claim from the Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account:(i)if the Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit determines that the person has provided sufficient evidence to meet the requirements of Subsection (5)(e);(ii)in the order that claims are filed with the Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit; and(iii)to the extent that it there is money in the Identity Theft Victims Restricted Account.(g)If there is insufficient money in the Identity Theft Victims Restrict Account when a claim is filed under this Subsection (5) to pay the claim in full, the Fraudulent Documents Identification Unit may pay a claim when there is sufficient money in the account to pay the claim in the order that the claims are filed.(6)The strike force shall make an annual report on itsthe strike force's activities to the governor and, the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201, and the Legislature's Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee by December 1, together with any proposed recommendations for modifications to this section.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 77-27-32 is amended to read:77-27-32. Reporting requirements.(1)The board shall publicly display metrics on the board's website, including:(a)a measure of recidivism;(b)a measure of time under board jurisdiction;(c)a measure of prison releases by category;(d)a measure of parole revocations;(e)a measure of alignment of board decisions with the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1; and(f)a measure of the aggregate reasons for departing from the guidelines described in Subsection (1)(e).(2)On or before September 30 of each year, the board shall submit to the commission and the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee a report for the previous fiscal year that summarizes the metrics in Subsection (1).(3)On or before November 1 of each year, the board shall submit the metrics described in Subsection (1) to the commission.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 80-5-202 is amended to read:80-5-202. Division rulemaking authority -- Reports on sexual assault.(1)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules to:(a)establish standards for the admission of a minor to detention;(b)describe good behavior for which credit may be earned under Subsection 80-6-704(5);(c)establish a formula, in consultation with the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, to calculate savings from General Fund appropriations under 2017 Laws of Utah, Chapter 330, resulting from the reduction in out-of-home placements for juvenile offenders with the division;(d)establish policies and procedures regarding sexual assaults that occur in detention and secure care facilities; and(e)establish the qualifications and conditions for services provided by the division under Section 80-6-809.(2)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules:(a)that govern the operation of prevention and early intervention programs, youth service programs, juvenile receiving centers, and other programs described in Section 80-5-401; and(b)that govern the operation of detention and secure care facilities.(3)A rule made by the division under Subsection (1)(a):(a)may not permit secure detention based solely on the existence of multiple status offenses, misdemeanors, or infractions arising out of a single criminal episode; and(b)shall prioritize use of home detention for a minor who might otherwise be held in secure detention.(4)The rules described in Subsection (1)(d) shall:(a)require education and training, including:(i)providing to minors detained in secure care and detention facilities, at intake and periodically, easy-to-understand information, which is developed and approved by the division, on sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling in consultation with community groups with expertise in sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling; and(ii)providing training specific to sexual assault to division mental health professionals and all division employees who have direct contact with minors regarding treatment and methods of prevention and investigation;(b)require reporting of any incident of sexual assault, including:(i)ensuring the confidentiality of sexual assault reports from minors and the protection of minors who report sexual assault; and(ii)prohibiting retaliation and disincentives for reporting sexual assault;(c)require safety and care for minors who report sexual assault, including:(i)providing, in situations in which there is reason to believe that a sexual assault has occurred, reasonable and appropriate measures to ensure the minor's safety by separating the minor from the minor's assailant, if known;(ii)providing acute trauma care for minors who report sexual assault, including treatment of injuries, HIV prophylaxis measures, and testing for sexually transmitted infections;(iii)providing confidential mental health counseling for minors who report sexual assault, including:(A)access to outside community groups or victim advocates that have expertise in sexual assault counseling; and(B)enabling confidential communication between minors and community groups and victim advocates; and(iv)monitoring minors who report sexual assault for suicidal impulses, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and other mental health consequences resulting from the sexual assault;(d)require staff reporting of sexual assault and staff discipline for failure to report or for violating sexual assault policies, including:(i)requiring all division employees to report any knowledge, suspicion, or information regarding an incident of sexual assault to the director or the director's designee;(ii)requiring disciplinary action for a division employee who fails to report as required; and(iii)requiring division employees to be subject to disciplinary sanctions up to and including termination for violating agency sexual assault policies, with termination the presumptive disciplinary sanction for division employees who have engaged in sexual assault, consistent with constitutional due process protections and state personnel laws and rules;(e)require that any report of an incident of sexual assault be referred to the Division of Child and Family Services or a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the detention or secure care facility in which the alleged sexual assault occurred; and(f)require data collection and reporting of all incidents of sexual assault from each detention and secure care facility.(5)The division shall annually report the data described in SectionSubsection (4)(f) to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim CommitteeState Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201.

Section 11:
Section 12.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.